Idaho, session 2025, S1157.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 34-708A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-708A. INDEPENDENT CANDIDATES FOR PRESIDENT AND VICE PRESI-
DENT. (1) Persons who desire to be independent candidates for the offices
of president and vice president must file declarations of candidacy as in-
dependent candidates no later than August 1. Such declarations must state
that such persons are offering themselves as independent candidates and must
declare that they have no political party affiliation. The declarations Any
person who desires to be an independent candidate for the office of president
must file a declaration of candidacy as an independent candidate no later
than August 1. Such declaration must state that such person is an indepen-
dent candidate with no political party affiliation and shall have attached
thereto a petition signed by one thousand (1,000) qualified electors.
(2) The candidates for president and vice president shall be considered
as candidates for one (1) office, and only one (1) such petition need be filed
for both offices.
(3) (2) Signatures on the petitions petition required in this section
shall be verified no later than September 1 in the manner prescribed in sec-
tion 34-1807, Idaho Code, on a form similar to that used for recall petitions
under chapter 17, title 34, Idaho Code, as prescribed by the secretary of
state;, except that the petition circulators are not required to be Idaho
residents. The secretary of state shall certify candidate qualifications no
later than September 1.
SECTION 2. That Section 34-711A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-711A. CERTIFICATION OF INDEPENDENT PRESIDENTIAL ELECTORS. In-
dependent presidential candidates who have qualified for ballot status
pursuant to section 34-708A, Idaho Code, shall certify the names of the vice
presidential candidate and of presidential electors to the secretary of
state on or before September 1, unless an extension of no more than five (5)
days is granted by the secretary of state, in order for them to appear on the
general election ballot. The secretary of state shall certify the indepen-
dent presidential electors, and the independent candidates for president


and vice-president, vice president to the county clerks on or before Septem-
ber 7.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.